South Dakota, session 2026, HB1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 35-4-78 be AMENDED:
35-4-78. No licensee, or any employee or agent of a licensee, may sell, or serve
any alcoholic beverage to any person who is obviously intoxicated. A violation of this
section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
However, no licensee is civilly liable to any injured person or the injured person's
estate for any injury suffered, including any action for wrongful death, or property damage
suffered because of the intoxication of any person due to the sale or consumption of any
alcoholic beverage in violation of the provisions of this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.